Hawaii statutes.
§662-13 No awards except upon legal
evidence. In no case shall any liability be implied against the State, and
no award shall be made against the State except upon such legal evidence as
would establish liability against an individual or corporation. [L 1957, c 312,
pt of §1; Supp, §245A-13; HRS §662-13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next